Hawaii statutes.
§180-8 Organization of district. To
complete the organization of the district, the department of land and natural
resources shall present to the lieutenant governor a statement setting out the
name of the district and its boundaries, and certifying that the procedures
prescribed in this chapter for the organization of a district have been fully
complied with in organizing this district. The statement shall request the
lieutenant governor to issue a certificate of organization to the district.
The lieutenant governor shall record the statement in the lieutenant governor's
office and shall issue to the directors of the district a certificate, under
the seal of the State, of the due organization of the district. [L 1947, c 191,
pt of §5; RL 1955, §28-11; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §§9, 22; am L 1961, c 132, §2;
am L 1967, c 145, §§1, 2; HRS §180-8; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next